incubator/apertium-hi-ur.hi.dix
    <pardef n="ह्/ओ__व्">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओकर</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओ</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:0"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओऊँ</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओ</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइए</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइये</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओ</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओयें</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओएँ</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओ</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइए</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइये</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओयें</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओएँ</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओना</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओने</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओनी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओनीं</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओता</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओते</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओती</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओतीं</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उआ</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उए</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उये</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उई</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उईं</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>उयीं</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओऊँगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइयेगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइएगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओंगे</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओगे</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइयेगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइएगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओंगे</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओऊँगी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओगी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइयेगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइएगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओगी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओंगी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओगी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइयेगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओइएगा</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ओंगी</l>
          <r>ओ<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="हो"><i>ह्</i><par n="ह्/ओ__व्"/></e>
